Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1808.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 405.2 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 405.2. Workfare Program.--* * *(a.1) Within six months of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish a workfare pilot program in counties of the fourth and fifth class in accordance with the following:(1) An individual receiving cash assistance under Temporary Assistance for Needy Families may receive benefits while working for an employer for a forty-hour work week and receiving pay equivalent to twenty hours of work.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) After the individual has worked for the employer for six months, the individual may continue to receive up to seventy percent of their cash assistance and shall be paid for thirty hours for working a forty-hour work week.(3) After the individual has worked for the employer for twelve months, the individual shall be paid for a full forty hours of work for working a forty-hour work week, and the department shall terminate the cash assistance payments to the individual.(4) The applicable provisions of this section shall apply to the workfare pilot program.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1808PN2223 - 2 - 12345678910111213